District of Columbia statutes.
5-731

Existing relief and rights preserved.

Nothing in subchapter I of this chapter shall be deemed to reduce the relief or retirement compensation to which any person is entitled on the effective date of such sections and the rights of such persons and their survivors shall continue in the same manner and to the same extent as if such sections had not been enacted.

History

Aug. 21, 1957, 71 Stat. 399, Pub. L. 85-157, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-631.
1973 Ed., § 4-536.

References in Text

The “effective date” is prescribed by § 8 of the Act of August 21, 1957, 71 Stat. 399, Pub. L. 85-157.